District of Columbia statutes.
25-120

Manager’s license requirements and qualifications.

(a)

A manager’s license shall authorize the licensee to manage a licensed business.

(b)

A licensee may be employed by one or more licensed businesses without further investigation, subject to compliance by the licensed businesses.

(c)

A manager’s license shall be valid for 2 years or until surrendered, suspended, or revoked. The fee for both years of the manager’s license shall be paid at the time of application.

(d)

A manager shall complete an alcohol training and education certification program conducted by a Board-approved provider. The manager shall be recertified every 2 years from the date of the initial certification.

(e)

Repealed.

(f)

Repealed.

(g)

Repealed.

(h)

A manager required to complete an alcohol training and education certification program under this section shall submit proof of certification to the Board on a form supplied by a Board-approved training provider.

(i)

(A)

The Board may suspend, revoke, or not renew the manager’s license of a manager who within the prior 2 years has:

(i)

Directly sold an alcoholic beverage to a minor on 2 or more dates;

(ii)

Directly interfered with an ABRA or Metropolitan Police Department investigation;

(iii)

Made false or misleading statements during or after a regulatory inspection or investigation;

(iv)

Aided, abetted, or conspired with a licensed or unlicensed person to evade compliance with the requirements of this title; or

(v)

Allowed the manager’s license to be used by an unlicensed person.

(B)

The Board shall provide notice to the holder of the manager’s license pursuant to the requirements set forth in § 25-447(c) before suspending or revoking a manager’s license pursuant to this subsection.

(C)

A subsequent manager’s license application for the person whose license was suspended or revoked or renewal denied shall not be considered within 2 years of a previous Board suspension, revocation, or denial.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 6(a), 48 DCR 7612
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1702(d), 49 DCR 6968
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(e), 51 DCR 6525
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-84, § 2(a)(8), 63 DCR 781
This section is referenced in § 25-121.
D.C. Law 14-42 validated the previously made technical corrections in subsecs. (e) and (g).
D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (c), substituted “The fee for both years of the manager’s license shall be paid at the time of application” for “The license fee shall be paid as provided under Chapter 5”.
D.C. Law 15-187, in subsec. (f), substituted “prior to receiving” for “within 90 days after receiving”.
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-84 repealed (e), (f), and (g); and added (i).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(a) of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(d) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).